Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-10,108
Order of delivery; execution; powers of officer.

The sheriff or other officer, in the execution of the order of delivery, may break open any building or enclosure in which the property claimed, or any part thereof, is concealed; but not until he has been refused an entrance into said building or enclosure and the delivery of the property, after having demanded the same.

R.S.1867, Code § 195, p. 424;

R.S.1913, § 7837;

C.S.1922, § 8781;

C.S.1929, § 20-10,108;

R.S.1943, § 25-10,108.

There is no place, office or institution where officers of law cannot go to make service of order. Hopkins v. State ex rel. Omaha Cooperage Co., 64 Neb. 10, 89 N.W. 401 (1902).